North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-03.3 Commitment of Sexually Dangerous Individuals
25-03.3-17.
Postcommitment proceeding, discharge, and further disposition. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A committed individual must remain in the care, custody, and control of the executive director until, in the opinion of the executive director, the individual is safe to be at large.

Each committed individual must have an examination of that individual’s mental condition at least once a year. A report regarding the examination must be provided to the court that committed the individual. At the time of the annual examination, the committed individual has the right to have an expert examine the individual, and, upon the request of an indigent committed individual, the court shall appoint a qualified expert to examine the committed individual and report to the court. The department of health and human services shall compensate a qualified expert appointed by the court in a reasonable amount based on time and expenses. That expert must have reasonable access to the committed individual and to all records relating to the committed individual, including confidential records.

If a committed individual has been committed to an out-of-state facility by the executive director for purposes of treatment, an expert from that state may be appointed by the court as a qualified expert for an indigent committed individual for any postcommitment proceeding.

After any report pursuant to this section is provided to the court, the court may order further examination and investigation of the committed individual as the court considers necessary. The court may set the matter for a hearing. At the hearing, the committed individual is entitled to be present and to the benefit of the protections afforded at the commitment proceeding. The state’s attorney shall represent the state at the hearing. After the hearing, the court shall determine whether the committed individual is to be discharged or to be retained as a sexually dangerous individual in the care, custody, and control of the executive director.

The executive director may only discharge a sexually dangerous individual from commitment pursuant to a court order. The executive director may petition the committing court at any time for the discharge of the committed individual. The executive director shall give the state’s attorney notice of any petition for discharge the executive director files with the court. Before the petition is granted, the state’s attorney has the right to be heard by the court on the petition. The state’s attorney may waive this right.

If the executive director moves a committed individual from a placement in the community to a placement in a secure treatment facility that is more restrictive, the committed individual may challenge the move at a hearing to be held within thirty days after the move in accordance with procedures established by the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 243, § 1; 2001, ch. 256, §§ 12, 13; 2021, ch. 352, § 284, effective September 1, 2022.

25-03.3-18.
Petition for discharge — Notice. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Annually, the executive director shall provide the committed individual with written notice that the individual has a right to petition the court for discharge. The notice must explain to the committed person when the committed person has a right to a hearing on the petition. The notice must inform the committed person of the rights this chapter affords the committed person at a discharge hearing. The executive director shall forward a copy of the notice to the committing court. If the committed individual is an individual with an intellectual disability, the executive director shall also provide the written notice to the individual’s attorney, guardian, and guardian ad litem, if any.

If the committed individual files a petition for discharge and has not had a hearing pursuant to section 25-03.3-17 or this section during the preceding twelve months, the committed individual has a right to a hearing on the petition.

At the hearing on the petition for discharge, the committed individual is entitled to be present and to the benefit of the protections afforded at the commitment proceeding. The state’s attorney shall represent the state and may have the committed individual evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The committed individual is entitled to have an expert of the committed individual’s choice conduct an evaluation. The court shall appoint a qualified expert if the committed individual is indigent and requests an appointment. The department of human services shall compensate a qualified expert appointed by the court in a reasonable amount based on time and expenses. That expert must have reasonable access to the committed individual and to all records relating to the committed individual, including confidential records.

At any hearing held pursuant to a petition for discharge, the burden of proof is on the state to show by clear and convincing evidence that the committed individual remains a sexually dangerous individual.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 243, § 1; 2001, ch. 256, § 14; 2011, ch. 207, § 14.

25-03.3-18.
Petition for discharge — Notice. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Annually, the executive director shall provide the committed individual with written notice that the individual has a right to petition the court for discharge. The notice must explain to the committed person when the committed person has a right to a hearing on the petition. The notice must inform the committed person of the rights this chapter affords the committed person at a discharge hearing. The executive director shall forward a copy of the notice to the committing court. If the committed individual is an individual with an intellectual disability, the executive director shall also provide the written notice to the individual’s attorney, guardian, and guardian ad litem, if any.

If the committed individual files a petition for discharge and has not had a hearing pursuant to section 25-03.3-17 or this section during the preceding twelve months, the committed individual has a right to a hearing on the petition.

At the hearing on the petition for discharge, the committed individual is entitled to be present and to the benefit of the protections afforded at the commitment proceeding. The state’s attorney shall represent the state and may have the committed individual evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The committed individual is entitled to have an expert of the committed individual’s choice conduct an evaluation. The court shall appoint a qualified expert if the committed individual is indigent and requests an appointment. The department of health and human services shall compensate a qualified expert appointed by the court in a reasonable amount based on time and expenses. That expert must have reasonable access to the committed individual and to all records relating to the committed individual, including confidential records.

At any hearing held pursuant to a petition for discharge, the burden of proof is on the state to show by clear and convincing evidence that the committed individual remains a sexually dangerous individual.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 243, § 1; 2001, ch. 256, § 14; 2011, ch. 207, § 14; 2021, ch. 352, § 285, effective September 1, 2022.

25-03.3-18.1.
Annual review — Petition for discharge — Inapplicability during periods of imprisonment.

Sections 25-03.3-17 and 25-03.3-18 do not apply if a respondent, during a period of commitment under this chapter, is transferred to the custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation in accordance with section 29-27-07 or is serving a term of imprisonment in a county jail or regional corrections center. Upon release from imprisonment, the respondent must be retransferred to the care, custody, and control of the executive director. Upon retransfer, the respondent is entitled to a review to determine whether continued commitment under this chapter is warranted.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 225, § 2.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

25-03.3-19.
Appeal.

The respondent has the right to an appeal from an order of commitment or an order denying a petition for discharge. Upon entry of an appealable order, the court shall notify the respondent of the right to appeal and the right to counsel. The notice of appeal must be filed within thirty days after entry of the order. The appeal must be limited to a review of the procedures, findings, and conclusions of the committing court. Pending a decision on appeal, the order appealed from remains in effect. If the respondent is an individual with an intellectual disability, the court shall provide notice of the right to appeal to the respondent’s attorney, the respondent’s guardian, and guardian ad litem.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 243, § 1; 2001, ch. 256, § 15; 2011, ch. 207, § 15.

25-03.3-20.
Limitation of liability.

A person acting in good faith upon either actual knowledge or reliable information, who provides information to the state’s attorney or the court pursuant to this chapter, is not subject to civil or criminal liability.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 243, § 1.

25-03.3-21.
Recovery of expense. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services, to the extent it has expended sums or provided services pursuant to this title, may seek civil recovery from the property of the respondent or committed individual. The department of human services must commence the action within six years after the department paid the sums or provided the services to the respondent or committed individual. After notice and hearing, the court may order an individual to reimburse the department of human services for all or part of the expenditures made for that individual pursuant to this chapter. In establishing the amount of reimbursement ordered under this section, the court shall consider the ability of the respondent or committed individual to pay.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 243, § 1.

25-03.3-21.
Recovery of expense. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services, to the extent it has expended sums or provided services pursuant to this title, may seek civil recovery from the property of the respondent or committed individual. The department of health and human services must commence the action within six years after the department paid the sums or provided the services to the respondent or committed individual. After notice and hearing, the court may order an individual to reimburse the department of health and human services for all or part of the expenditures made for that individual pursuant to this chapter. In establishing the amount of reimbursement ordered under this section, the court shall consider the ability of the respondent or committed individual to pay.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 243, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 286, effective September 1, 2022.

25-03.3-22.
Rules. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services may adopt rules under chapter 28-32 to implement this chapter, but the rules may not restrict or limit the rights guaranteed by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 256, § 16.

25-03.3-22.
Rules. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may adopt rules under chapter 28-32 to implement this chapter, but the rules may not restrict or limit the rights guaranteed by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 256, § 16; 2021, ch. 352, § 287, effective September 1, 2022.

25-03.3-23.
Individual rights.

For so long as a committed individual is placed in and resides at a treatment facility, the committed individual has the same rights as other residents of the facility, subject to the following limitations and restrictions:

The individual’s rights are subordinate to legitimate safety precautions and to the terms of the applicable individualized habilitation or treatment plan.

If an individual’s rights are inconsistent with this chapter in a particular situation, the specific provisions of this chapter prevail.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 256, § 17.

25-03.3-24.
Postcommitment community placement — Penalty.

Following commitment of a sexually dangerous individual, the executive director may conduct a risk management assessment of the committed individual for the purpose of determining whether the individual may be treated safely in the community on an outpatient basis. The executive director may place a committed individual in the community for treatment on an outpatient basis only pursuant to a court order. The executive director may petition the court at any time for community placement. The executive director shall give the state’s attorney of the county of community placement notice of any petition for community placement the executive director files with the court. Before the petition is granted, the state’s attorney has the right to be heard by the court. The state’s attorney may waive this right. At any hearing held pursuant to a petition by the executive director for the community placement of a committed individual, the burden of proof required of the executive director is a preponderance of the evidence. The court’s order of community placement must contain appropriate restrictions and requirements for the committed individual, including:

Participation and compliance with a specific course of treatment;

Submission to electronic monitoring and any other appropriate supervision;

Prohibition of the individual changing place of residency or leaving the state without prior authorization of the court;

Establishment of safety zones, and compliance by the committed individual with those safety zones;

Requirement that the committed individual notify the court within twenty-four hours of any change in the individual’s status that affects proper treatment or supervision;

Contact with victims is prohibited independent of a supervised treatment plan; and

Any other restriction or requirement deemed necessary by the court to assure public safety and proper treatment of the committed individual.

Violation by a committed individual of a court order issued pursuant to this section is a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 250, § 1.